Utah statutes.
9-8-602.   Authority to write and publish county history -- Administration
of project.
(1)  Any county may enter into an agreement with the division to write and
publish a complete and reliable history of that county.  The county may
designate its county historical society, other agency of county government, or
other entity to represent the county for purposes of this agreement.
(2)  The division shall supervise and administer this project to write and
publish the complete and reliable history of each county and shall render
professional expertise to the county or its designee as needed.
